incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="m/adh__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r>adh<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëdhenj</l>
          <r>adh<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adhe</l>
          <r>adh<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/eq__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eq</l>
          <r>eq<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëqij</l>
          <r>eq<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eqe</l>
          <r>eq<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lig__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="kuq__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="këndsh/ëm__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëm</l>
          <r>ëm<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>ëm<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tej/më__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>më</l>
          <r>më<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>më<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Predeterminers -->

    <pardef n="të_gjith/a__predet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="predet"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>a<s n="predet"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <!-- FIXME: p1.sg, p2.sg and p2.pl need checking -->
    <pardef n="duhe/t__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>t<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mund__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ëm</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ën</l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="të gjitha"><i>të<b/>gjith</i><par n="të_gjith/a__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="kuq"><i>kuq</i><par n="kuq__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trim"><i>trim</i><par n="kuq__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="afërm"><i>afërm</i><par n="kuq__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="këndshëm"><i>këndsh</i><par n="këndsh/ëm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sotëm"><i>sot</i><par n="këndsh/ëm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="djeshëm"><i>djesh</i><par n="këndsh/ëm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tejmë"><i>tej</i><par n="tej/më__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="keq"><i>k</i><par n="k/eq__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><i>lig</i><par n="lig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="madh"><i>m</i><par n="m/adh__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mund"><i>mund</i><par n="mund__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="duhet"><i>duhe</i><par n="duhe/t__vbmod"/></e>
